Utah statutes.
35A-3-401.   General Assistance.
(1) (a)  General Assistance may be provided to individuals who are not
receiving cash assistance under Part 3, Family Employment Program, or
Supplemental Security Income, and who are unemployable according to standards
established by the department.
(b) (i)  General Assistance may be provided by payment in cash or in kind.
(ii)  The office may provide an amount less than the existing payment level
for an otherwise similarly situated client of cash assistance under Part 3,
Family Employment Program.
(c)  The office shall establish asset limitations for General Assistance
clients.
(d) (i)  General Assistance may be granted to meet special nonrecurrent needs
of an applicant for the federal Supplemental Security Income program, if the
applicant agrees to reimburse the division for assistance advanced while
awaiting the determination of eligibility by the Social Security
Administration.
(ii)  General Assistance payments may not be made to a current client of cash
assistance or Supplemental Security Income.
(e) (i)  General Assistance may be used for the reasonable cost of burial for
a client, if heirs or relatives are not financially able to assume this
expense.
(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(e)(i), if the body of a person is
unclaimed, Section 53B-17-301 applies.
(iii)  The department shall fix the cost of a reasonable burial and conditions
under which burial expenditures may be made.
(2)  The division may cooperate with any governmental unit or agency, or any
private nonprofit agency in establishing work projects to provide employment
for employable persons.
